Massachusetts, session 194th, S1314.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 151 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding at the end of the first paragraph the following:-
This section shall not apply to workers under the age of 18 who work 20 hours or less per
week and require a work permit, for the first 120 hours of employment with a new employer.
Said 120-hour period shall be referred to as a training period. Said workers under the age of 18
who are in the training period shall be subject to a minimum wage no less than $10 per hour.
of 1